North Dakota, session 69, SB2004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, to the ethics commission for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the
ethics commission, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Ethics commission $1,041,374 $316,707 $1,358,081
New and vacant FTE pool 0 9,935 9,935
Total general fund $1,041,374 $326,642 $1,368,016
Full-time equivalent positions 3.00 0.00 3.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which the entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth legislative
assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description General Fund
Case management system $50,000
Office furniture 2,348
Total $52,348
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FULL-TIME EQUIVALENT POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER
REQUEST. The ethics commission may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant full-time
equivalent pool line item in section 1 of this Act, but may request the office of management and budget
to transfer funds from the new and vacant full-time equivalent pool line item to the ethics commission
line item in accordance with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as
approved by the sixty-ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Section 12.1-13-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
12.1-13-02. Speculating or wagering on official action or information.
1. A personAn individual is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if during employment as a public
servant, or within one year thereafter, in contemplation of official action by himselfthe

S. B. NO. 2004 - PAGE 2
individual as a public servant or by a government agency with which hethe individual is or has
been associated as a public servant, or in reliance on information to which hethe individual
has or had access only in histhe individual's capacity as a public servant, hethe individual:
a. Acquires a pecuniary interest in any property, transaction, or enterprise which may be
affected by suchthe information or official action;
b. Speculates or wagers on the basis of suchthe information or official action; or
c. Aids another individual to do any of the foregoing.
2. A personAn individual is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if as a public servant hethe individual
takes official action which is likely to benefit himthe individual as a result of an acquisition of a
pecuniary interest in any property, transaction, or enterprise, or of a speculation or wager,
which hethe individual made, or caused or aided another to make, in contemplation of suchthe
official action.
3. An individual is immune from prosecution under this section if:
a. The individual was a member of the legislative assembly at the time the official action
was taken;
b. The official action was a vote on a measure in the senate or house of representatives or
a legislative committee; and
c. The individual adhered to legislative conflict of interest rules requiring an individual to
disclose a personal or private interest to the member's respective chamber of the
legislative assembly, a legislative committee, the president of the senate, or the speaker
of the house.
SECTION 5. A new section to chapter 54-03 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Voting on legislation - Immunity - Affirmative defense.
If an individual who is a member of the legislative assembly adheres to:
1. Legislative rules requiring an individual to disclose a personal or private interest to the
member's respective chamber of the legislative assembly, a legislative committee, the
president of the senate, or the speaker of the house, the individual and an organization for
which the individual is an agent, as defined in section 12.1 - 03 - 04, is immune from crimina l
prosecution under the laws of this state for an offense arising from the individual voting on a
measure in a legislative committee, the senate, or the house of representatives.
2. Informal advice from a staff member of the ethics commission, reliance on the advice is an
affirmative defense in a prosecution for an offense arising from the individual voting on a
measure in a legislative committee, the senate, or the house of representatives.
SECTION 6. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-66-01. Definitions.
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
1. "Accused individual" means a lobbyist, public official, candidate for public office, political
committee, or contributor who is alleged to have violated article XIV of the Constitution of
North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or rule regarding transparency, corruption,
elections, or lobbying.

S. B. NO. 2004 - PAGE 3
2. "Complainant" means an individual who, in writing or verbally, submits a complaint to the
commission and is:
a. A North Dakota resident;
b. Subject to licensing by a state agency or other public official subject to the jurisdiction of
the ethics commission; or
c. A party to a quasi-judicial proceeding before a state agency or other public official subject
to the jurisdiction of the ethics commission.
3.2. "Complaint" means a verbal or written allegation to the commission that a lobbyist, public
official, candidate for public office, political committee, or contributor has violated article XIV of
the Constitution of North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or rule regarding transparency,
corruption, elections, or lobbying.
4.3. "Ethics commission" or "commission" means the North Dakota ethics commission established
by article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota.
5.4. "Gift" means any item, service, or thing of value not given in exchange for fair market
consideration including travel and recreation, except:
a. Purely informational material;
b. A campaign contribution; and
c. An item, service, or thing of value given under conditions that do not raise ethical
concerns, as set forth in rules adopted by the ethics commission, to advance
opportunities for state residents to meet with public officials in educational and social
settings in the state.
6.5. "Influence state government action" means promoting or opposing the adoption of a rule by an
administrative agency or the commission under chapter 28-32.
7.6. "Lobby" means an activity listed in subsection 1 of section 54-05.1-02.
8.7. "Lobbyist" means an individual required to register under section 54-05.1-03.
9.8. "Public official" means an elected or appointed official of the state's executive or legislative
branch, members of the commission, members of the governor's cabinet, and employees of
the legislative branch.
10.9. "Receives the complaint" means one or more members of the commission learn of the
complaint.
10. "Respondent" means a lobbyist, public official, candidate for public office, political committee,
or contributor who is alleged to have violated article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota ,
this chapter, or another law or rule regarding transparency, corruption, elections, or lobbying.
11. "Ultimate and true source" means the person that knowingly contributed over two hundred
dollars solely to lobby or influence state government action.
SECTION 7. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2004 - PAGE 4
54-66-04. Ethics commission member terms - Meetings - Code of ethics - Compensation -
Office.
1. The terms of the initial members of the ethics commission must be staggered to ensure no
more than two members' terms expire in one year. The terms of the initial members may be
less than four years to accommodate the required staggering of terms.
2. Unless the complaint at issue has resulted in the imposition of a penalty or referral for
enforcement under section 54-66-09, any portion of a meeting during which commission
members discuss complaints, informal resolutions, attempts to informally resolve complaints,
investigations, or referrals under this chapter, the identity of an accused individuala
respondent or complainant, or any other matter arising from a complaint are closed meetings.
3. The commission shall abide by a code of ethics adopted in a public meeting. The code of
ethics must specify when a commission member is disqualified from participating in matters
before the commission.
4. Ethics commission members are entitled to:
a. Compensation for each day necessarily spent conducting commission business in the
amount provided for members of the legislative management under section 54-35-10;
and
b. Payment for mileage and travel expenses necessarily incurred in the conduct of
commission business as provided under sections 44-08-04 and 54-06-09.
5. The director of the office of management and budget shall allocate office space in the state
capitol for the ethics commission, or, if office space in the capitol is unavailable, shall negotiate
for, contract for, and obtain office space for the ethics commission in the city of Bismarck or in
the Bismarck area. The ethics commission's office space may not be located in the office
space of any other government agency, board, commission, or other governmental entity, and
must provide sufficient privacy and security for the ethics commission to conduct its business.
The director shall charge the ethics commission an amount equal to the fair value of the office
space and related services the office of management and budget renders to the ethics
commission.
SECTION 8. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-05 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-66-05. Making a complaint - Summary dismissal of complaint.
1. A complaint may be made to the commission orally or in writing. If a complainant does not
provide the complainant's name, address, and telephone number with the complaint, the
ethics commission may not investigate or take other action regarding the complaint. The
commission shall summarize each oral complaint in writing unless the complaint must be
disregarded under this section.
2. Upon receipt of a complaint or information regarding a violation, the commission may
summarily dismiss the complaint or decline to proceed with a complaint if the alleged violation
does not fall within the commission's jurisdiction, is insufficient to identify a possible violation,
or fails to comply with rules adopted by the commission. In lieu of summary dismissal, the
commission may refer the matter under section 54-66-08.
3. If a complainant would like the complainant's identity to remain confidential, the commission
may not release the complainant's name and address to the accused individualrespondent
without the authorization of the complainant. If the complainant does not authorize release of
the complainant's name and address to the accused individualrespondent, the statement of
the complainant may not be used as evidence of a violation.

S. B. NO. 2004 - PAGE 5
4. If the commission receives an anonymous complaint that contains documentary or real
evidence of possible criminal conduct, the commission may refer the matter to the appropriate
law enforcement agency as provided under section 54-66-08, and may not otherwise divulge
the documentary or real evidence.
SECTION 9. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-06 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-66-06. Informing the accused individualrespondent - Written response permitted - Petition
to dismiss complaint.
1. Within thirty calendar days, the commission shall inform an accused individuala respondent of
the complaint. Subject to the confidentiality requirements set forth in section 54-66-05, the
accused individualrespondent will be provided with the written complaint or written summary of
the oral complaint, witness statements, and other documentary evidence included with the
complaint. The accused individualrespondent may provide a written response to the complaint
within thirty calendar days, or after the commission requests a written response to the
complaint or summary of the complaint, a period as set by the commission. This subsection
does not preclude the accused individualrespondent from providing a written response to the
complaint before receiving a request for written response from the commission.
2. If the commission has summarily dismissed the complaint under subsection 2 of section
54-66-05, before notifying the accused individualrespondent as required by this section, the
notification to the accused individualrespondent must include notice of the summary dismissal.
SECTION 10. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-66-07. Informal resolution.
The commission shall attempt to negotiate or mediate an informal resolution between the accused
individualrespondent and the complainant unless the commission summarily dismissed the complaint
under section 54-66-05. The accused individualrespondent may be accompanied by legal counsel in a
negotiation or mediation. If the informal resolution process between the respondent and the
complainant is unsuccessful, the commission may work with the respondent to settle and close the
matter.
SECTION 11. AMENDMENT. Subsection 2 of section 54-66-08 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
2. If the commission believes a complaint contains allegations of criminal conduct, the matter
mustmay be coordinated with the appropriate law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over
the offense. If the law enforcement agency agrees to accept a referral for possible criminal
prosecution, the commission may not take further action on the complaint until the law
enforcement agency informs the commission law enforcement proceedings regarding the
complaint are complete. If the law enforcement agency declines a referral for prosecution, the
commission may investigate the complaint under the rules adopted by the commission. If the
law enforcement agency takes no action on the referral for prosecution within sixty days, the
commission may resume its review of the complaint. Unless the agency accepting the referral
objects, the commission shall inform the complainant and respondent as soon as reasonably
possible of a referral and the nature of the referred allegations.
SECTION 12. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-09 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:

S. B. NO. 2004 - PAGE 6
54-66-09. Investigation findings - Ethics commission determinations.
1. An investigator, other than a law enforcement agency, of a complaint shall provide written
findings of the investigation to the ethics commission within a reasonable amount of time. The
ethics commission shall provide copies of the written findings and evidence considered to the
accused individualrespondent, who may respond to the commission in person or in writing
within a reasonable time. If the accused individualrespondent responds in person, no fewer
than three members of the commission shall meet in a closed meeting with the accused
individualrespondent. An accused individualA respondent may be accompanied by legal
counsel when responding to the commission in person. Upon completion of an investigation,
the executive director shall prepare a report and recommendation to the commission to close
the matter or issue an alleged violation. The commission may issue an alleged violation,
require additional investigation, or close the matter.
2. After providing a reasonable time for an accused individuala respondent to respond to the
investigation findings and considering any response to the findings, the ethics commission
shall determine whether a violation of article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota, this
chapter, or another law or rule regarding transparency, corruption, elections, or lobbying
occurred, and inform the accused individualrespondent of the determination. If the commission
determined a violation occurred, the commission may impose a penalty authorized by law for
the violation or refer the matter to the agency with enforcement authority over the violation.
3. The commission may not terminate the employment of a public official or otherwise remove a
public official from the public official's public office.
4. The ethics commission may not reconsider, invalidate, or overturn a decision, ruling,
recommended finding of fact, recommended conclusion of law, finding of fact, conclusion of
law, or order by a hearing officer under chapter 28-32 on the grounds the hearing officer failed
to grant a request for disqualification under section 28-32-27 or failed to comply with
subsection 5 of section 2 of article XIV of the Constitution of North Dakota.
5. The respondent may petition the commission at any time to dismiss the complaint in the
manner prescribed by the commission.
SECTION 13. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-10 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-66-10. Appeals.
An accused individualA respondent may appeal a finding of the ethics commission to the district
court of the county where the accused individualrespondent resides.
SECTION 14. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-12 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-66-12. Confidential information.
1. The following information is a confidential record as defined in section 44-04-17.1, unless the
commission has determined the accused individualrespondent violated article XIV of the
Constitution of North Dakota, this chapter, or another law or rule regarding transparency,
corruption, elections, or lobbying, and a court affirmed the determination if appealed, except
the information may be disclosed as required by law or as necessary to conduct an
investigation arising from a complaint:
a. Information revealing the contents of a complaint;
b. Information that reasonably may be used to identify an accused individuala respondent;
and

S. B. NO. 2004 - PAGE 7
c. Information relating to or created as part of an investigation of a complaint.
2. If a complaint is informally resolved under section 54-66-07, the following information is a
confidential record as defined in section 44-04-17.1:
a. Information revealing the contents of the complaint;
b. Information that reasonably may be used to identify the accused individualrespondent;
c. Information relating to or created as part of the process leading to the informal resolution;
and
d. Information revealing the informal resolution.
3. Information that reasonably may be used to identify the complainant is confidential unless the
complainant waives confidentiality, authorizes its disclosure, or divulges information that
reasonably would identify the complainant. Information, including evidence under
consideration by the investigator or commission, deemed confidential under this subsection
may be disclosed as required by law or as necessary to conduct an investigation arising from
a complaint to include disclosure of evidence being considered to an accused individuala
respondent.
4. The information deemed confidential in subsections 1 and 2 may be disclosed by the
respondent and the ethics commission if the accused individualrespondent agrees to the
disclosure.
SECTION 15. AMENDMENT. Section 54-66-18 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
54-66-18. Conflicts of interest - Legislative assembly.
1. Each legislative assembly shall adopt conflict of interest rules. The rules must:
a. Require the disclosure by a member of a potential conflict of interest relating to any bill in
which the member may have a direct, unique, substantial, or and individual interest.
b. Ensure a mechanism is in place to record each disclosure and make it readily available
to the public.
2. If the legislative assembly adopts rules under subsection 1 which are at least as restrictive as
the conflict of interest rules adopted by the ethics commission, the disclosure process portion
of the conflict of interest rules adopted by the ethics commission may not apply to members of
the legislative assembly.
SECTION 16. A new section to chapter 54-66 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Complaint management time standards.
The commission shall adopt rules for the efficient and timely disposition of complaints from receipt
to resolution.
SECTION 17. A new section to chapter 54-66 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Ethics commission annual report.
1. The ethics commission shall prepare an annual report each fiscal year. The ethics commission
shall make the annual report available on its public website within sixty days of the end of
each fiscal year.

S. B. NO. 2004 - PAGE 8
2. The annual report must include:
a. The number of complaints received by the commission, the status of those complaints,
the commission's actions to resolve the complaints, and the timing related to those
actions;
b. The number of advisory opinions requested and issued, as well as information regarding
general conflict disclosures and quasi-judicial disclosures received; and
c. Information regarding education and outreach and the status of the commission's budget.
3. The annual report may include recommendations for new or revised laws, rules, or policies
that could improve the confidence that North Dakota citizens have in their government.
SECTION 18. EMERGENCY. Sections 4, 5, 10, 11, 14, and 15 of this Act are declared to be an
emergency measure.

S. B. NO. 2004 - PAGE 9
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2004 and that two-thirds of the
members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 44 Nays 2 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of
said law.
Vote: Yeas 71 Nays 19 Absent 4
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State